Utah statutes.
57-9-6.   Applicability of provisions.

This act may not be applied to bar:

(1)  any lessor or his successor as a reversioner of his right to possession on the expiration of any lease; or

(2)  extinguish any easement or interest in the nature of an easement created or held for any pipeline, highway, railroad or public utility purpose, or any easement or interest in the nature of an easement, the existence of which is clearly observable by physical evidence of its use; or

(3)  extinguish any water rights, whether evidenced by decrees, by certificates of appropriation, by diligence claims to the use of surface or underground water or by water users' claims filed in general determination proceedings; or

(4)  extinguish any right, title, estate, or interest in and to minerals, and any development, mining, production or other rights or easements related to the minerals or exercisable in connection  with the minerals; or

(5)  any right, title, or interest of the state in school or institutional trust lands or sovereign lands; or

(6)  any right, title, or interest of the United States, by reason of failure to file the notice herein required.

